Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 5 CHILD WELFARE SERVICES
26-5-105.5. State department integrated care management program - county performance agreements - authorized - performance incentive cash fund created - repeal.

There is hereby created the state department integrated care management program. In administering the state department integrated care management program, the state department shall develop, by rule, principles of integrated care management and a process to allow counties or groups of counties specified in section

26-5-104 (4)(b)(I)

to participate in the program. Individual counties or groups of counties specified in section

26-5-104 (4)(b)(I)

may participate in the integrated care management program for the delivery of child welfare services.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 526, § 1, effective May 24, 2002.)

The state department is hereby authorized to enter into performance agreements with individual counties or groups of counties specified in section 26-5-104 (4)(b)(I). A county that enters into a performance agreement with the state department shall be exempt from the rules of the state department and state board governing the delivery of child welfare services, as such exemptions are identified in the performance agreement.

and (3.2) Repealed.

(3.5) Evaluation.

The state department is authorized to contract for an external evaluation of the performance agreements authorized pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Any such external evaluation shall include any evaluation that may be required in connection with any waiver authorized pursuant to section

26-5-105.3

. Criteria for and components of the evaluation shall be developed by the state department with input from the counties authorized pursuant to this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2001, p. 1172, § 9, effective August 8, 2001.)

This subsection (3.5) is repealed on the date the executive director of the state department notifies the revisor of statutes that the state is no longer participating in the waiver authorized pursuant to Title IV-E of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended.

(3.7) The state board shall promulgate rules necessary to implement the integrated care management program established pursuant to this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2002, p. 526, § 1, effective May 24, 2002.)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1430, § 4, effective June 3.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 708, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2001:

(3.5) amended, p. 1172, § 9, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 526, § 1, effective May 24.

L. 2003:

(3.2) amended, p. 387, § 3, effective March 5.

L. 2004:

(3.2)(c) added, p. 1554, § 2, effective May 28.

L. 2018:

(3) repealed, (SB 18-254), ch. 216, p. 1384, § 7, effective May 18.

26-5-105.7. Study of managed care - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 1430, § 4, effective June 3.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1998. (See L. 97, p. 1430.)

26-5-105.8. Delivery of child welfare services task force - creation - duties - membership - reporting requirements - repeal.

There is created in the state department the delivery of child welfare services task force, referred to in this section as the "task force". The state department, in collaboration with counties, shall convene the task force at least once per quarter, beginning July 1, 2018. The purpose of the task force is to:

Analyze laws and rules related to the delivery of child welfare services to ensure alignment with the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act of 2018", as defined in section 26-5-101 (4.5);

Develop a method through which to incentivize counties for the provision of services and placements that are based on the needs of the child or youth, as determined by the assessment and review process required by the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act of 2018", as defined in section 26-5-101 (4.5), and determine the level to which the state department shall reimburse the counties for certain out-of-home placements that do not meet the criteria of the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act of 2018";

Establish performance and outcome measures and the process by which to evaluate the measures associated with the delivery of child welfare services, including but not limited to residential out-of-home placements; foster care; adoption; and services to children and youth in their own homes, including prevention and intervention services, and determine how the measures and evaluation will be used to inform the funding model described in section 26-5-103.7 and the allocation of funds pursuant to section 26-5-104 (3);

Investigate collaborative prevention and intervention models throughout the country and determine modifications that can be made to the collaborative management and integrated care management programs in order to guarantee ongoing cross-systems collaboration, improved outcomes for children and families, integration of multi-system services, and expansion of system-of-care principles, while maintaining the integrity and capacity of the child welfare system and its associated funding;

Evaluate and select one or more statewide level-of-care tools to ensure compliance with the federal "Family First Prevention Services Act of 2018", as defined in section 26-5-101 (4.5);

Evaluate the process through which the state accesses federal funding and determine methods through which the state will maximize federal funding for the delivery of prevention and intervention services, out-of-home placement services, and any other federally funded programs or services;

Evaluate medicaid rates and the eligibility determination process and timeline specifically related to individuals involved in the child welfare system and develop a process through which counties can maximize medicaid utilization; and

Make recommendations to the joint budget committee, the governor, the state department, and the child welfare allocations committee concerning the task force's responsibilities and findings.

The task force members must be appointed by August 1, 2018, and must include, but are not limited to, the following members:

The executive director of the state department, or his or her designee;

The executive director of the department of health care policy and financing, or his or her designee;

The state court administrator, or his or her designee;

One person from a behavioral health services provider, appointed by the state department;

Three persons who represent the provider community, appointed by the state department as follows:

One person who represents prevention and intervention providers;

One person who represents out-of-home placement providers; and

One person who represents providers with expertise in promising, supported, or well-supported practices or programming; and

Three persons who represent the counties, appointed by the state department.

Except as provided for in section 2-2-326, members of the task force shall serve on a voluntary basis without compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

The task force shall develop a plan to implement its recommendations and provide a quarterly update, beginning October 15, 2018, on the task force's progress to the joint budget committee, the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, and the health and human services committee of the senate, or any successor committees.

(4.5) On or before July 31, 2022, the task force shall report to the funding model evaluation group established in section 26-5-103.7 its recommendations for including in the child welfare services funding model described in section 26-5-103.7 performance and outcome measures and outcome-based incentives related to the stability and well-being of children who receive child welfare services. The task force may provide updated recommendations to the evaluation group prior to the repeal of this section.

This section is repealed, effective June 30, 2023.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-254), ch. 216, p. 1384, § 8, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

(1)(c), (1)(h), and (5) amended and (4.5) added, (SB 21-277), ch. 343, p. 2239, § 4, effective June 25.

26-5-106. Fraudulent acts. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1196, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-4-6.

L. 77:

Entire section repealed, p. 1335, § 7, effective January 1, 1978.

Cross references:

For present provision relating to fraudulent acts in obtaining child welfare, see § 26-1-127.

26-5-107. Limitations of article.

All child welfare services granted under this article shall be granted and held subject to the provisions of any amending or repealing law that may be passed after July 1, 1973, and no recipient shall have any claim for compensation or otherwise by reason of his services being affected in any way by any amending or repealing law.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1196, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-4-7.

26-5-108. Developmental assessment - rules.

The appropriate county department of human or social services shall refer each child under five years of age who is the subject of a substantiated case of abuse or neglect to the appropriate state or local agency for developmental screening within sixty days after abuse or neglect has been substantiated. The state board shall promulgate rules to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1234, § 4, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-092), ch. 38, p. 448, § 122, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 18-092, see section 1 of chapter 38, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

26-5-109. Child welfare training academy established - rules.

There is hereby established within the state department the child welfare training academy, referred to in this section as the "academy", to ensure that certain persons hired to work within child welfare services receive the necessary training to perform the functions of their jobs responsibly and effectively. The state department shall administer the academy in accordance with rules promulgated by the state department pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

On or before September 15, 2009, the state department shall promulgate rules for the administration of the academy. The rules shall include:

Identification of specific job titles within child welfare services that shall be required to attain certification from the academy as a mandatory condition of employment;

Identification of specific job titles within child welfare services that shall be required to complete ongoing or occasional training from the academy as a mandatory condition of employment;

Establishment of minimum standards of competence that a person shall be required to demonstrate prior to receiving certification from the academy, which standards of competence shall include, but need not be limited to, a demonstrated ability to perform the duties described in section 19-3-313.5 (2), C.R.S.;

Identification of means by which a person may demonstrate the minimum standards established pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (2); and

Establishment of alternative methods for attaining certification from the academy for persons who have already successfully completed comparable child welfare training, including a description of child welfare training that shall be deemed to be comparable to the training offered by the academy.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-164), ch. 276, p. 1239, § 2, effective May 19.

26-5-110. Guardianship assistance program - legislative declaration - eligibility - rules.

The general assembly declares that:

The state of Colorado has a strong interest in providing permanency options to children who are part of the foster care system;

Children and youth in the child welfare system are better served when family ties are preserved and strengthened because permanent family connections are critical to a child's overall well-being and development;

The general assembly has established through past legislation a statutory preference for placement with relatives and kin at all stages of a child welfare case;

To help support permanency with family and kin relationships when adoption and reunification are either unavailable or not appropriate permanency options for the child, the general assembly created the "Relative Guardianship Assistance Program" in 2010, as authorized by the federal "Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008", Pub. L. 110-351;

The state of Colorado has a strong interest in providing permanency options to children who are part of the traditional foster care system and who are not otherwise able to be placed with relatives or kin;

It is appropriate to further the goal of permanency by passing legislation to provide financial assistance for the care of children, when it is in accordance with federal law, to relatives, kin, and foster parents who have a significant relationship with the child, as outlined in statute, and who have assumed legal guardianship or allocation of parental responsibilities of children who they previously cared for as certified foster parents through the federal "Title IV-E Adoption and Guardianship Assistance Program", 42 U.S.C. sec. 673 (d); and

It is therefore the intent of the general assembly that the state guardianship assistance program will be utilized to enhance family preservation and provide a permanency option for children who have developed a significant relationship with their foster parent caregiver when reunification and adoption are either unavailable or not appropriate permanency options for the child, and provide stability in safe and stable placements with relatives, kin, and foster parent caregivers in circumstances set forth in this legislation.

There is established a guardianship assistance program in the state department, referred to in this section as the "program". Assistance from the program is available when a court has determined that adoption and reunification with the child's or children's parent or legal guardian are not appropriate permanency options for the child or children. Program assistance is available in the following situations:

To relatives, kin, and persons ascribed by the family as having a family-like relationship with the child or children and who:

Are committed to the child's or children's permanency;

Were the certified foster parent or parents of the child or children for a minimum of six consecutive months at the time they assumed guardianship or allocation of parental responsibilities; and

Have assumed legal guardianship of or allocation of parental responsibilities for the child or children; or

To a certified foster parent or parents who do not otherwise qualify for the program pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section if:

The child or children in the certified foster parent's or parents' care are twelve years of age or older, or if at least one of the children in the sibling group is eleven years of age or younger and has an older sibling who receives assistance from the program;

The dependency and neglect court finds that the child or children have a substantial psychological tie to the certified foster parent or parents, such that it would be seriously detrimental to the child's or children's emotional well-being to remove the child or children from the certified foster parent's or parents' care, as described in section 19-3-702 (4)(e)(III);

Adoption and reunification are not appropriate permanency options for the child or children, and the dependency and neglect court finds, pursuant to section 19-3-702 (4)(e)(III) that the child's or children's certified foster parent or parents are unable to adopt the child because of exceptional circumstances, which do not include an unwillingness to accept legal responsibility for the child, but they are willing and capable of providing the child with a stable and permanent environment;

The certified foster parent or parents of the child or children have cared for the child or children for a minimum of twelve months; and

The certified foster parent or parents have assumed legal guardianship of or allocation of parental responsibilities for the child or children with the child's or children's consent who are twelve years of age or older.

The state department shall promulgate rules that comply with the provisions of 42 U.S.C. sec. 673 (d) for the implementation of this section for situations where a child or children have been removed from the home through a judicial determination that continuation in the home would not be in the best interest of the child or children, and that reunification and adoption are not appropriate permanency options for the child or children.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (SB 09-245), ch. 436, p. 2424, § 2, effective June 4.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (SB 12-066), ch. 86, p. 284, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2016:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 16-1448), ch. 359, p. 1496, § 1, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

IP(2)(b), (2)(b)(II), and (2)(b)(III) amended, (HB 19-1219), ch. 237, p. 2356, § 7, effective August 2.

26-5-111. Statewide child abuse reporting hotline system - legislative declaration - definitions - child abuse hotline steering committee - rules on consistent processes in response to reports and inquiries for information.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that the purpose of enacting this section is to:

Create, based on recommendations of a steering committee with broad representation, a statewide child abuse reporting hotline system to serve as a direct, immediate, and efficient route to the applicable entity responsible for accepting the report and to the applicable entity responsible for responding to an inquiry and that is available twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week; and

Authorize rule-making by the state board to ensure that there are standards for the consistent screening, assessment, and decision-making in response to reports of known or suspected child abuse and neglect and to inquiries made to a county department or to the hotline system.

The general assembly declares that the hotline system to be developed as outlined in this section enhances the current child welfare system. The hotline system is intended to provide an additional option for the public to make an initial report of suspected or known child abuse or neglect or making an inquiry. The county department will retain screening responsibilities, unless the board of county commissioners of the county department has approved the use of the hotline system on behalf of the county and such arrangement has been approved by the executive director.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Child abuse reporting hotline system" or "the hotline system" means the uniform method of contact that directly, immediately, and efficiently routes the person to the applicable entity responsible for accepting a report pursuant to section 19-3-307, C.R.S., or to the applicable entity responsible for responding to an inquiry and that is advertised to the public as a place for reporting known or suspected child abuse or neglect or for making inquiries.

"Information and referral" means an initial contact from the public which does not constitute a report of abuse or neglect but is an inquiry and the response to the inquiry, as defined in rule.

"Inquiry" means a request for information or for specific services.

"Mandatory reporter" means a person who is required to report child abuse or neglect pursuant to section 19-3-304, C.R.S.

"Report" means an initial report of known or suspected child abuse or neglect.

The state department shall develop a child abuse hotline steering committee, including state, county, and comprehensive and appropriate stakeholder representation. The state department shall appoint a person to the steering committee who is a primary provider of emergency fire fighting services, law enforcement, ambulance, emergency medical, or other emergency services and who is familiar with the emergency telephone system that uses the single three-digit number 9-1-1 for reporting police, fire, medical, or other emergency situations. The steering committee is expected to develop an implementation plan for a statewide child abuse reporting hotline system, which is advertised to the public and to mandatory reporters, and to make recommendations for rules relating to the operation of the hotline system and relating to consistent practices for responding to reports and inquiries. The purpose of the hotline system is to provide a direct, immediate, and efficient route to the entity responsible for accepting a report pursuant to section 19-3-307, C.R.S. The public may also contact the hotline system for inquiries. The hotline system must operate twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week. The hotline may consist of multiple methods of communication, as prescribed by rules of the state board. The steering committee shall submit a report no later than July 1, 2014, containing its recommendations to the executive director, who shall provide the report to the state board. The hotline system shall be operational and publicized statewide no later than January 1, 2015.

With the express written consent of the board of county commissioners of a county, a county department may request that the state department assist that county with the taking of calls or initial contacts from the public of reports of possible child abuse or neglect or of inquiries. The executive director of the state department must approve this arrangement in writing.

Based upon the recommendations of the child abuse hotline steering committee, the state department shall establish a statewide child abuse reporting hotline system.

The state board is authorized to adopt rules, based upon the recommendations of the child abuse hotline steering committee, and may revise rules, as necessary, including but not limited to the following:

The type of technology that may be used by the hotline system for directly routing initial contacts from the hotline system to the applicable entity responsible for accepting reports pursuant to section 19-3-307, C.R.S., or to the applicable entity to respond to an inquiry, including but not limited to a single statewide toll-free telephone number, and including technologies for language translation and for communicating with people who are deaf or have hearing impairments, such as telecommunications devices for the deaf (TDD) or text telephone services (TTY), with flexibility to adapt the methods to changing and emerging technologies as appropriate;

The operation of the hotline system, including the central record keeping and tracking of reports and inquiries statewide, and a requirement that the record keeping and tracking of reports and inquiries be accessible to all counties through the state's case management system;

Rules governing the standards and steps for information and referral and how an inquiry is routed to the applicable entity responsible for responding to an inquiry;

How an initial report to the hotline system is directly routed to the applicable entity responsible for accepting a report pursuant to section 19-3-307, C.R.S.;

A formal process for a county department to opt to have the state department receive reports or inquiries on behalf of the county department after hours subject to a requirement that the board of county commissioners must officially approve the use of the hotline system on behalf of the county and such arrangement must be approved by the executive director;

A process for a county department to opt to have another county department receive reports or inquiries on behalf of the county department after hours or on a short-term basis with notification of such arrangement to the executive director;

Standardized training and certification standards for all staff prior to taking reports and inquiries;

A consistent screening process with criteria and steps for the county department to follow in responding to a report or inquiry; and

Rules establishing a consistent decision-making process with criteria and steps for the county department to follow when deciding how to act on a report or inquiry or when to take no action on a report or inquiry.

The state department shall submit periodic reports to the appropriate legislative committee pursuant to the requirements of part 2 of article 7 of title 2, C.R.S., pertaining to the implementation or operation of the hotline system, the progress of implementing the hotline system, the outcomes from the operation of the hotline system, and the outcomes from the adoption of rules and practices for consistent screening, assessment, and decision-making for reports of known or suspected child abuse and neglect and for inquiries.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1271), ch. 219, p. 1018, § 1, effective May 14.

26-5-112. Child welfare caseload study - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2015:

Entire section added, (SB 15-242), ch. 141, p. 431, § 3, effective May 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2017. (See L. 2015, p. 431.)

26-5-113. Extended services for former foster care youth.

A county department may coordinate certain services to former foster care youth who request such services in order to support such former foster care youth in becoming self-sufficient adults. This section is not meant to replace services for foster care youth who remain in the custody of a county department. The determination of whether a youth who is in foster care is ready to leave the custody of the county department remains under the jurisdiction of the court.

A county department may opt to serve former foster care youth who have been in the custody of the division of youth services if such youth are included in the plan for services for a successful adulthood.

The department of local affairs may assist a county department in securing available housing vouchers through programs offered by the department of local affairs, such as the homeless solutions program, the housing choice voucher program, or any other appropriate supportive housing program for former foster care youth, specifically between the ages of eighteen and twenty-one, who are experiencing homelessness or imminent risk of homelessness. If appropriations are available, the department of local affairs may assist former foster care youth with security deposits related to housing.

The managed care entity contracted with for the department of health care policy and financing's statewide managed care system shall assist a county department that opts to serve former foster care youth who are enrolled in medicaid.

State institutions of higher education and community colleges shall work with the county departments to explore ways to support former foster care youth both financially and through other supportive services. This support includes reviewing the ability to provide tuition assistance and other fee waivers to former foster care youth.

A county department may support former foster care youth pursuant to this section by developing a plan for services for a successful adulthood and transferring an amount of money out of the county's core services funding and into a fund for services for a successful adulthood.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1319), ch. 217, p. 1390, § 3, effective May 18.

26-5-114. Former foster care youth steering committee - implementation plan - recommendations - report.

The state department shall establish a former foster care youth steering committee that includes comprehensive and appropriate stakeholder representation from the state and county level. The state department shall convene the committee on or before October 30, 2018. The steering committee shall:

Develop an implementation plan that allows former foster care youth to receive services for a successful adulthood or assistance in returning to placement, as well as alternatives to returning to placement after reaching eighteen years of age but before reaching twenty-one years of age, or a later age if so recommended by the steering committee, and after the county department's jurisdiction ends;

Make recommendations relating to the operation, evaluation, and sustainability of the implementation plan. In making its recommendations, the steering committee shall use a consensus-based approach.

Coordinate with other committees formed by the general assembly that have similar or overlapping jurisdictional tasks or purposes.

On or before January 1, 2020, the steering committee shall submit a report with its recommendations for an implementation plan to the executive director of the department of human services; the governor; and the joint budget committee, the health and human services committee of the senate, the public health and environment committee of the house of representatives, or any successor committees.

The implementation plan recommended by the steering committee pursuant to this section is not required to become operational unless adequate state and federal funding is available.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (HB 18-1319), ch. 217, p. 1390, § 3, effective May 18.

26-5-115. Acquisition of drivers' licenses by individuals in foster care - immunity from liability - rules.

On and after September 7, 2021, in addition to any other reimbursement for child welfare services described in this article 5, the state department shall reimburse a county department for costs paid by the county department to a public or private driving school for the provision of driving instruction to an individual in the custody of the county department who is fifteen years of age or older and under twenty-one years of age.

The state department may seek and accept gifts, grants, and donations from private or public sources for the purposes of this section; except that the state department may not accept a gift, grant, or donation that is subject to conditions that are inconsistent with this section or any other law of the state.

Nothing in this section places any liability on a county department for:

Contracting with a public or private driving school to provide driving instruction to an individual who is in the custody of the county department; or

An injury alleged to have occurred while an individual in the custody of the county department received driving instruction from a public or private driving school.

Nothing in this section waives or limits a county department's governmental immunity, as described in article 10 of title 24.

On or before December 1, 2021, the state board shall promulgate rules for the administration of this section.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (HB 21-1084), ch. 203, p. 1068, § 1, effective September 7.

26-5-116. Fostering educational opportunities for youth in foster care program - creation - report.

There is created in the state department the fostering educational opportunities for youth in foster care program, referred to in this section as the "program", to improve educational opportunities for students in out-of-home placements. The program must serve students in grades nine through twelve who are or previously were in out-of-home care, with the option to expand to grades six through eight. The program must be modeled after the Jefferson county pilot program to improve educational outcomes for foster youth described in section 24-37-404, and, as part of the program, the state department shall continue to administer the pilot program after funding for the pilot program is no longer available. Subject to available funding, the state department shall contract with at least two but no more than five additional school districts to implement the program. The state department shall select the school districts based on district need, local foster care population, and geographic diversity.

On July 1, 2023, and each July 1 thereafter, the state department shall publish a report on its website and submit the report to the legislative audit committee of the general assembly, the health and human services and education committees of the senate, the public and behavioral health and human services and education committees of the house of representatives, or any successor committees. The report must include information on program implementation and performance metrics of students identified in the foster care education initiative as described in section 22-32-138 (9).

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the requirement to submit the report described in this subsection (2) continues indefinitely.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1374), ch. 273, p. 1970, § 3, effective May 31.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Foster Care Youth Success Act") in HB 22-1374, see section 1 of chapter 273, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.